Maryland, session 2025, HB0052.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
Article I – Elective Franchise
1.
All elections shall be by ballot. Except as provided in SECTION 1A, Section 2A, or
Section 3 of this article, every citizen of the United States, of the age of 18 years or upwards,
who is a resident of the State as of the time for the closing of registration next preceding
the election, shall be entitled to vote in the ward or election district in which the citizen
resides at all elections to be held in this State. [A person] AN INDIVIDUAL once entitled to
vote in any election district, shall be entitled to vote there until the [person] INDIVIDUAL
shall have acquired a residence in another election district or ward in this State.
1A.
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL HAVE THE POWER TO PROVIDE BY SUITABLE
ENACTMENT THE AUTHORITY OF A COUNTY TO LOWER THE AGE AT WHICH AN
INDIVIDUAL MAY VOTE IN AN ELECTION FOR THE MEMBERS OF AN ELECTED COUNTY
BOARD OF EDUCATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Election Law
3–102.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, an individual may
become registered to vote if the individual:
(i) is a citizen of the United States;
(ii) is at least 16 years old;
(iii) is a resident of the State as of the day the individual seeks to
register; and
(iv) registers pursuant to this title.

HOUSE BILL 52 3
(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection, an individual
under the age of 18 years:
(i) may vote in a primary election in which candidates are
nominated for a general or special election that will occur when the individual is at least
18 years old; [and]
(ii) IF AUTHORIZED UNDER § 3–102.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE BY THE
COUNTY IN WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL IS REGISTERED TO VOTE, MAY VOTE IN AN
ELECTION FOR MEMBERS OF AN ELECTED COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION; AND
(III) may not vote in any other election.
(b) An individual is not qualified to be a registered voter if the individual:
(1) has been convicted of a felony and is currently serving a court–ordered
sentence of imprisonment for the conviction;
(2) is under guardianship for mental disability and a court of competent
jurisdiction has specifically found by clear and convincing evidence that the individual
cannot communicate, with or without accommodations, a desire to participate in the voting
process; or
(3) has been convicted of buying or selling votes.
3–102.1.
A COUNTY MAY ENACT A LOCAL LAW THAT ALLOWS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS AT
LEAST 16 YEARS OLD TO VOTE IN AN ELECTION FOR MEMBERS OF AN ELECTED
COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the amendment to the
Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this Act shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the State at the next general election to be held in November 2026 for adoption or
rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution. At that general
election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be by ballot, and on
each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the Constitutional Amendment” and
“Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now provided by law. Immediately after the
election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of the vote for and against the proposed
amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution, and further
proceedings had in accordance with Article XIV.

HOUSE BILL 52
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act is
contingent on the passage of Section 1 of this Act, a constitutional amendment, and its
ratification by the voters of the State.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to the provisions of
Section 5 of this Act, Section 2 of this Act shall take effect on the proclamation of the
Governor that the constitutional amendment, having received a majority of the votes cast
at the general election, has been adopted by the people of Maryland.